bg-BG: Тип интегрирано дъно: Боди; Слипове; Трико; Няма; Къси панталони; Боксерки; Други
ru: Тип интегрированного дна: Боди; Брифы; Гимнастический купальник; Нет; Шорты; Плавки-шорты; Другое
th: ประเภทกางเกงในตัว: บอดี้สูท; กางเกงในทรงบรีฟ; ลีโอตาร์ด; ไม่มี; กางเกงขาสั้น; กางเกงในทรงทรังก์; อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av Integrerad botten: Body; Trosor; Leotard; Ingen; Shorts; Badbyxor; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de fundo integrado: Body; Cuecas; Maillot; Nenhum; Calções; Calções de banho; Outro
vi: Loại đáy tích hợp liền khối: Bodysuit; Quần lót tam giác; Leotard; Không; Quần soóc; Quần lót ống vuông; Khác
cs: Integrovaný spodní typ: Body; Slipy; Trikot; Žádný; Kraťasy; Boxerky; Jiné
lt-LT: Integruotos apačios tipas: Glaudinukė; Kelnaitės; Triko; Nėra; Šortai; Glaudės; Kita
zh-TW: 內建底部類型: 連身衣; 三角褲; 緊身連衣褲; 無; 短褲; 平口褲; 其他
de: Integriertes Unterteil: Bodysuit; Slips; Gymnastikanzug; Keine; Shorts; Badehose; Sonstige
hr-HR: Integrirani donji tip: Bodi; Gaćice; Triko; Ništa; Kratke hlače; Bokserice; Ostalo
zh-CN: 连体下装类型: 连体衣; 三角裤; 紧身连衣裤; 无; 短裤; 平角裤; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de base integrada: Body; Slip; Collant; Nenhum; Shorts; Sunga/Shorts de banho; Outro
hu: Integrált alj típusa: Body; Alsónadrág/bugyi; Tornadressz; Nincs; Rövidnadrág; Boxeralsó; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta integriranega dna: Bodi; Spodnjice; Gimnastični dres; Brez; Kratke hlače; Boksarice; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip de bază integrată: Body; Chiloți; Costum de gimnastică; Fără; Pantaloni scurți; Boxeri; Altele
nl: Geïntegreerd type onderstuk: Bodysuit; Slip; Turnpakje; Geen; Shorts; Zwemshort; Overige
en: Integrated bottom type: Bodysuit; Briefs; Leotard; None; Shorts; Trunks; Other
ko: 일체형 바닥 유형: 바디슈트; 브리프; 레오타드; 없음; 반바지; 트렁크; 기타
fr: Type à fond intégré: Body; Culotte; Justaucorps; Aucun; Short; Caleçon; Autre
es: Tipo de base integrada: Body; Braga/calzoncillo; Leotardo; Ninguno; Pantalones cortos; Bañador tipo bóxer; Otro
tr: Entegre taban tipi: Bodysuit; Külot; Leotard; Yok; Şort; Kısa şort; Diğer
el: Τύπος ενσωματωμένου πάτου: Κορμάκι; Σλιπ; Κορμάκι; Κανένα; Σορτς; Σορτς-μαγιό; Άλλο
it: Tipo di fondo integrato: Body; Slip; Leotard; Nessuno; Pantaloncini; Boxer; Altro
nb: Integrert bunntype: Body; Truser; Turndrakt; Ingen; Shorts; Badeshorts; Annet
da: Integreret bundtype: Bodystocking; Trusser; Gymnastikdragt; Ingen; Shorts; Badebukser; Andet
ja: 一体型ボトムタイプ: ボディスーツ; ブリーフ; レオタード; なし; ショーツ; トランクス; その他
sk-SK: Typ integrovaného dna: Body; Nohavičky/slipy; Trikot; Žiadny; Šortky; Boxerky/trenírky; Iné
fi: Integroidun alaosan tyyppi: Body; Alushousut; Voimistelupuku; Ei mitään; Shortsit; Uimahousut; Muu
pl: Typ zintegrowanego spodu: Body; Figi; Kostium gimnastyczny; Brak; Szorty; Kąpielówki; Inny